Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3550
Certificate, license, or permit; effective, when.

Any certificate, license, or permit that is issued by the board is effective upon the issuance of such certificate, license, or permit.

Laws 2025, LB38, § 40.